Louisiana, session 2026, HB315.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 23:921(P) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§921. Restraint of business prohibited; restraint on forum prohibited; competing
business; contracts against engaging in; provisions for
* * *
P.(1) Notwithstanding any provision of this Section to the contrary, there
shall be no contract or agreement or provision entered into by an intern, whether paid
or unpaid, or apprentice and his employer restraining the intern or apprentice from
engaging in a business or an employment similar to that of the employer. The
contract or agreement or provision shall not restrict an intern or apprentice from
pursuing employment, educational, or professional opportunities following the
completion of the internship or apprenticeship. The intern or apprentice shall,
however, remain subject to the employer's confidentiality, intellectual property, and
data protection agreements.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 315 ENROLLED
(2) For the purposes of this Subsection, "intern" means a student learner who
participates in an internship authorized and regulated by the provisions of LAC
28:CXV.3113 or any successor regulations the Board of Elementary and Secondary
Education may publish relative to a work-based learning program classified as an
internship.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.